Washington statutes.
RCW 7.84.020

"Infraction" defined.

The definition in this section applies throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

"Infraction" means an offense which, by the terms of Title 76, 77, 79, or 79A RCW or RCW 7.84.030(2)(b) or 70A.200.060, and rules adopted under these titles and sections, is declared not to be a criminal offense or a civil infraction and is subject to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2024 c 231 s 5; 2012 c 176 s 2; 2003 c 39 s 3; 1999 c 249 s 503; 1993 c 244 s 3; 1987 c 380 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2024 c 231: See note following RCW 70A.200.060.

Severability—1999 c 249: See note following RCW 79A.05.010.

Intent—1993 c 244: See note following RCW 79A.60.010.